Missouri, session 2026, SB1735.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 191, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 191.117, to read as
follows:
191.117. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Lori Zena Baker Act".
2. There is hereby established in the department of
health and senior services a "Sickle Cell Standing
Committee" as a subcommittee of the Missouri genetic
advisory committee. The committee shall consist of the
following members:
(1) One member who is a licensed physician with
experience in the diagnosis and treatment of sickle cell
disease and who shall serve as chair of the committee;
(2) One member who has sickle cell disease or is a
family member of a person with sickle cell disease;
(3) One member with expertise in sickle cell disease
research;
(4) One member from a leading sickle cell disease
organization;
(5) One member with expertise in minority health; and

SB 1735 2
(6) One member from each of the hemoglobinopathy
center that contracts with the department.
3. The members of the committee shall be appointed by
the director of the department of health and senior
services. Members shall serve on the committee without
compensation or reimbursement for expenses incurred.
4. The committee shall:
(1) Assess the impact of sickle cell disease on urban
communities in the state of Missouri;
(2) Examine the existing services and resources
addressing the needs of persons with sickle cell disease; and
(3) Develop recommendations to provide educational
services to schools on the traits of sickle cell disease and
its effects.
5. The committee shall include an examination of the
following in its assessment and recommendations required
under subsection 4 of this section:
(1) Trends in state sickle cell disease populations
and their needs, including, but not limited to, the state's
role in providing assistance;
(2) Existing services and resources; and
(3) Needed state policies or responses, including, but
not limited to, directions for the provision of clear and
coordinated services and supports to persons living with
sickle cell disease and strategies to address any identified
gaps in services.
6. The committee shall hold a minimum of one meeting
at three urban regions in the state to seek public input.
7. The committee shall submit a report of its findings
and any recommendations to the general assembly and the
governor no later than December 31, 2027.

SB 1735 3
8. After December 31, 2027, the committee shall
continue to meet at the request of the chair and at a
minimum of one time annually for the purpose of continuing
the study of sickle cell disease in this state, the impact
of the committee recommendations, and to provide an annual
supplemental report on the findings to the governor and the
general assembly.
✓